Utah statutes.
41-6a-1804.   Exceptions.
(1)  This part does not apply to an operator or passenger of:
(a)  a motor vehicle manufactured before July 1, 1966;
(b)  a motor vehicle in which the operator or passengers possess a written
verification from a licensed physician that the person is unable to wear a
safety belt for physical or medical reasons; or
(c)  a motor vehicle or seating position which is not required to be equipped
with a safety belt system under federal law.
(2)  This part does not apply to a passenger if all seating positions are
occupied by other passengers.
